Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.140

Revenue bonds—Authority—Denominations—Terms.

A city or town may issue revenue bonds against the special fund or funds created solely from revenues. The revenue bonds so issued shall: (1) Be registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030 or coupon bonds, (2) be issued in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, (3) be numbered from one upwards consecutively, (4) bear the date of their issue, (5) be serial in form finally maturing not more than thirty years from their date, (6) bear interest at the rate or rates as authorized by the legislative body of the city or town, payable annually or semiannually, (7) be payable as to principal and interest at such place as may be designated therein, and (8) shall state upon their face that they are payable from a special fund, naming it and the ordinance creating it: PROVIDED, That such bonds may also be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 59; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 43; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 71; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.140. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-7, part.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.